Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 284.771 is amended to read:
284.771. As used in ORS 284.771 to 284.801, unless the context [ clearly] requires otherwise:
(1) “Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region” or “region[ ,]” [ as defined in  rules
adopted by the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board in  consultation with the Oregon
Business Development Department, ] means that part of the state that:
(a) Is within 20 miles of the Oregon border with the State of Idaho, and that includes, but  is not
limited to, the cities of Ontario, Vale and Nyssa;
(b) Includes Willow Creek and Brogan;
(c) Is an area in Oregon that is across the Oregon border from Weiser, Idaho; and
(d) Is an area southwest of Vale for a distance of 10 miles.
(2) “Economic development” means development that:
(a) Relates to and supports:
(A) The economic health or recovery of the region;
(B) Business enterprise and activities in the region; or
(C) Development or certification of regionally significant industrial sites in the region;
(b) Creates jobs or prevents the loss of jobs in the region; or
(c) Promotes or expands businesses or prevents the decline of businesses located or to be located
in the region.
(3) “Law” means statutes, administrative rules and any other form of regulation imposed by this
state or a political subdivision of this state.
(4) “Local governing body” means  either the county court or board of county commissioners of
the county.
(5) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(6) “Regionally significant industrial site” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285B.626.
(7) “Third-party administrator” means the entity with which the  Eastern Oregon Border
Economic Development Board enters into an agreement pursuant to ORS 284.781 (4).
[(7)] (8) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 1
[(8)(a)] (9)(a) “Workforce development” means activities or services  that assist individuals to
attain employment,  progress along career pathways or establish and maintain businesses and that
promote economic development by making skilled employees more readily available.
(b) “Workforce development” includes:
(A) Education, training and apprenticeships;
(B) Labor market analysis;
(C) Employment and reemployment assistance;
(D) Employee recruitment and retention;
(E) Workforce programs that  have a primary mission of helping individuals become employed,
retain employment, increase wages, progress along career pathways or establish and  maintain busi-
nesses;
(F) Convening, coordinating, oversight and evaluation activities  and services for business and
state workforce agencies; and
(G) Development of residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees in the region.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 284.776 is amended to read:
284.776. (1) The Eastern Oregon Border  Economic Development Board is established to formu-
late and implement strategies and practices for strategic  investment in workforce development and
economic development in the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region and to [ make
grants or loans to eligible applicants ] arrange for the awarding of grants and making  of loans
for the purpose of encouraging workforce development and economic development in the region.
(2) The board shall consist of seven voting members and one nonvoting member as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint  seven voting members from a list of eligible appointees with
expertise in traded sector business, education,  workforce development or economic development
provided by the local governing bodies within the  [ Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development ]
region. The Governor shall request an updated list  of eligible appointees from the local governing
bodies within the region for the purpose of making appointments when vacancies occur.
(b) The Director of the Oregon Business Development  Department, or the director’s designee,
is an ex officio nonvoting member of the board.
(3) The term of office of each voting member of the board is four  years, but a member serves
at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a voting  member, the Gover-
nor shall  appoint a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following. A member is eligible
for reappointment for a total of two consecutive terms. If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the
Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The Governor shall appoint one voting member of the board as the chairperson.
(5) A voting member  of the board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
(6) A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for  the transaction of
business.
(7)(a) The board shall meet at least once every three months  at a time and place determined by
the chairperson. In addition, the board [ also] may meet at other times and  places specified by the
call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the board.
(b) Meetings of the board are subject to ORS  192.610 to 192.690 governing public meetings and
ORS 192.311 to 192.478 governing public records.
(8) The board may establish any advisory or technical  committees the board considers necessary
to aid and advise the board  in the performance of its functions. The committees may be continuing
or temporary committees. The board shall determine the  representation, membership, terms and or-
ganization of the committees and shall appoint the members of the committees.
(9)(a) Until the board has entered into an agreement with a third-party administrator
pursuant to ORS 284.781 (4),  the Oregon Business Development  Department shall provide staff to
the board as necessary  to allow the board to carry out the board’s responsibilities under ORS
284.771 to 284.801. [ The department may contract with a  third party to provide staff to the board under
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 2
this subsection, provided that the third party  remains subject to the direction and control of the de-
partment.]
(b) Upon entering into the agreement,  the third-party administrator shall provide staff
to the board as necessary.
SECTION 3.  ORS 284.781 is amended to read:
284.781. The Eastern Oregon Border Economic  Development Board[ , in collaboration with and
with the assistance of the Oregon Business Development Department, ] has the following duties, func-
tions and powers:
(1) To identify policies and strategies that will:
(a) Promote workforce development,  including development of residential housing necessary to
attract and keep employees in  the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Region, and
economic  development;
(b) Facilitate the development [ or] and prevent the decline of regionally significant industrial
sites;
(c) Create [ or] and maintain jobs in the region; and
(d) Improve access to career and  technical education, workforce training programs and higher
education to enhance the availability of a qualified workforce for employers in the region.
(2) To make recommendations to  the Legislative Assembly for policies and strategies intended
to improve the availability of career  and technical education, workforce training programs and
higher education for the purpose of improving the  availability of a qualified workforce for employers
in the [ Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development ] region.
(3) To identify specific laws that place specific workforce development [ or] and economic de-
velopment efforts  in the [ Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development ] region, including develop-
ment of residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees  in the region, at a competitive
disadvantage with respect to the same type of efforts made in the  areas across the Oregon border
[as described in ORS 284.786 ] from the region and to take action in accordance with  ORS
284.786 upon identifying such laws.
[(4) Subject to the availability of funds in the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development
Board Fund, to make grants or loans to qualified applicants pursuant to ORS 284.791, not to  exceed
a total of 10 active grants at any one time. ]
[(5) To establish a means  to evaluate grants or loans made by the board and the department, in-
cluding, but not limited to, determining the number of businesses or  regionally significant industrial
sites assisted, the types and  amount of resources leveraged, return on investment criteria, performance
and outcome measures and methods to evaluate the  impact on jobs and wages in any area of the
Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region to which grant or loan  moneys were applied
or in which they were utilized. ]
(4) To enter into an agreement with a third-party administrator, subject  to approval by
the Oregon Business Development Department under section 6 of this 2020  special session
Act, pursuant to which the third-party administrator shall operate one or more programs
to award grants and make loans in accordance with ORS 284.791.
[(6)] (5) To facilitate collaboration among employers, local governments,  state agencies and
stakeholders  for  the purpose of enhancing and expanding workforce development and economic de-
velopment in the region.
[(7)] (6) To consult with affected school districts, community  colleges and universities and the
Employment Department in  identifying policies and strategies that will enhance and promote
workforce development to improve the availability of a qualified workforce for employers in the
[Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development ] region.
(7) To adopt rules that define the region more  specifically and to consult with the Oregon
Business Development Department in the rulemaking process.
[(8) To report annually on or before December 31 of each year to  standing and interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development regarding implementation and adminis-
tration of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board and  grants or loans made by the
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 3
board and the Oregon Business Development Department pursuant  to ORS 284.791. The report may
include recommendations regarding proposed legislation and strategies  to improve workforce develop-
ment and economic development in the region. ]
(8) To prescribe the form of the application required under ORS 284.791 (3).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 284.786 is amended to read:
284.786. [(1) The Eastern Oregon  Border Economic Development Board may identify specific laws
that repeatedly place specific workforce development or  economic development efforts in the Eastern
Oregon Border Economic Development Region, including development of residential housing  necessary
to attract and keep employees in the  region, at a competitive disadvantage to the same type of efforts
in the areas across the Oregon border. ]
[(2)] (1) Upon identifying a specific law in accordance with ORS 284.781 (3) , the Eastern
Oregon Border Economic Development  Board:
(a) May recommend to the agency, board or commission that imposes  or administers [ such a ]
the law that the agency, board or commission consider an  exception or waiver to the law[ , where
permitted by law, ] in order to assist in workforce  development and economic development efforts in
the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Region. Within 60 days of receiving a re-
commendation from the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board under this  paragraph,
the agency, board or commission shall review the recommendation and hold a public  hearing in the
region , or  otherwise consider information from the public and stakeholder entities , to determine
whether:
(A) The law has repeatedly posed a [ repeated] disadvantage to workforce development [ and] or
economic development in the region  in the last five years compared to comparable laws, rules or
other forms of regulation imposed by the State of Idaho  or a political subdivision of the State of
Idaho; and
(B) An exception or  waiver to the specific law may be made for the purpose of furthering
workforce development or economic development in the [ Eastern Oregon Border Economic Develop-
ment] region.
(b) If the agency, board or commission determines that an exception or waiver may not be made
under paragraph (a) of this subsection, may recommend to the agency, board or commission or  to
the Legislative Assembly that a specific exception or waiver be [ allowed] made for the purpose  of
workforce development or economic development in the region.
[(3)] (2) The Eastern Oregon Border  Economic Development Board may not recommend an ex-
ception or waiver to a specific law  if:
(a) The exception or waiver to the law is not permitted by law; or
(b) [ That is related ] The law relates  to employment or state taxation.
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this 2020 special session Act is added to and  made a part of ORS
284.771 to 284.801.
SECTION 6. (1) Upon finalizing a proposed agreement with a third-party administrator
pursuant to ORS 284.781 (4), the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board  shall
submit the proposed agreement to the Oregon Business Development Department.
(2) The department shall review the proposed agreement  and if the department deter-
mines that the agreement  is sufficient for the purposes of ORS 284.771 to 284.801, department
shall:
(a) Notify the board and the third-party administrator of its determination; and
(b) Distribute to the third-party administrator all moneys in the Eastern Oregon Border
Economic Development Board Fund established under ORS 284.801 that are available for the
purpose of awarding grants and making loans in accordance with ORS 284.791.
(3)(a) If the department determines that the proposed agreement is not sufficient,  the
department shall return the agreement to the board with recommendations for  revising or
rejecting the agreement.
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 4
(b) The board may consult with  the department regarding the department’s recommen-
dations and, with the department’s approval, resubmit the agreement  with appropriate
changes as necessary.
(4)(a) The board or the third-party  administrator may terminate the agreement at any
time.
(b) Upon termination of the  agreement by either party, the third-party administrator
shall transfer all unspent and unobligated  moneys remaining from the moneys distributed
under subsection (2) of this section to the department for deposit in the Eastern Oregon
Border Economic Development Board Fund.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 284.791 is amended to read:
284.791. (1)(a) Subject to available funds, [the availability of  funds in the Eastern Oregon Border
Economic Development Board  Fund, the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board may ]
the third-party administrator shall  operate one or more programs to  award grants [ or] and
make loans to eligible applicants  to enhance and expand workforce development or economic de-
velopment in the Eastern Oregon Border  Economic Development Region. [Repayment of loans made
under this section is subject to subsection (8) of this section. The board shall make the  decision to ap-
prove and award grants or loans under this section, but the Oregon Business Development  Department
shall be responsible for the actual payment of the grants or loans from the Eastern  Oregon Border
Economic Development Board Fund. ]
(b) No more than 10 programs may be active at any time. A program is active as  long
as any loan  made through the program remains outstanding or any work or project funded
or financed by a grant awarded through the  program has not been completed in accordance
with the grant agreement.
(2) Eligible applicants for grants and loans  include, but are not limited to:
(a) Local governments;
(b) Institutions of higher education as defined in ORS 348.582;
(c) Private  or nonprofit businesses whose principal place of business, or the majority of whose
workforce, is located in the [ Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development ] region;
(d) Small business development centers established under ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171;
(e) Economic development organizations;
(f) School districts; and
(g) Other types of entities [ as defined by the board ] specified by the Eastern  Oregon Border
Economic Development Board  by rule.
(3)(a) An eligible applicant may apply to the third-party  administrator  for a grant or loan
[by submitting an application and paying the required application fee, if  any, in accordance with rules
adopted by the board in  consultation with the department. The rules must, at a minimum: ]. The
third-party administrator may not consider an application  unless the application is timely
and accompanied by any required  application fee. The third-party administrator shall pre-
scribe deadlines for the application process.
[(a)] (b) [ Establish criteria for the award of grants or loans under this section  that provide that
the] An applicant must demonstrate that the grant or loan moneys will be used for:
(A) Economic development  that will lead to private investment, job creation or retention and the
establishment or expansion of viable businesses in the region;
(B) Expansion of [ a] transportation infrastructure [ sufficient] to  facilitate moving traded sector
goods or services in the region to market;
(C) Enhancement and expansion of workforce development in the region, including  development
of residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees in the region, that is responsive  to
the needs of the region’s businesses and industries;
(D) Certification of regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(E) Extension of  private utilities, including, but not limited to, gas and electrical connections,
to regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 5
(F) A due diligence assessment  pursuant to the Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Assessment
Program under  ORS 285B.635 to 285B.640 or other assessments or evaluations that prepare a site
for development; or
(G) Provision of support services and technical assistance to entrepreneurs and business owners
in the region, including, but not limited to, small business  development centers established under
ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171 .[; and ]
[(b) Establish criteria for repayment of loans, collection of moneys owed and repayment of grant
proceeds in the event of default. ]
[(4) Applications for loans must contain: ]
[(a) A plan for repayment by  the applicant to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development
Board Fund of moneys borrowed from the fund plus interest; and ]
[(b) If required by the department and the board, evidence  of debt assurance of, or security for,
repayment by the applicant. ]
(c) Applications for loans must  contain a proposed plan for repayment with interest of
moneys borrowed from the third-party administrator under this section.
(d) The board shall adopt rules that, at a minimum, establish criteria for awarding grants
and making loans under this  section, in addition to the criteria set forth in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
[(5)] (4) Loans may not be  made under this section[ :]
[(a) May not  be ] for a [ loan] term that exceeds the [ usable] useful life of the work or project for
which the loan funds will be used or a specified number of years from completion  of the work  or
project, whichever is less .[; and ]
[(b) Are subject to subsection (8) of this section regarding repayment of loans made by the  depart-
ment.]
[(6)(a)] (5) [ Grants or loans made under this section  are payable solely from the Eastern Oregon
Border Economic Development Board Fund established under ORS 284.801. ] Amounts paid as grants
[or] and loans shall not constitute  a debt of the state or a lending of the credit of the state within
the meaning of any [ constitutional or ] statutory limitation and are not intended to constitute a
debt of the state or a lending of the credit of  the state within the meaning of any constitu-
tional limitation.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, nothing  in this section is intended to impair
the exercise of rights granted against the security for a loan, if any. ]
[(7)] (6) The  [ department shall assist the board in evaluating ] third-party administrator shall
consider applications for grants [ or] and loans under this section by:
(a) Evaluating timelines for completion of work and projects for which grant  or loan moneys
requested in the application will be used;
(b) Investigating whether necessary permits for  development, if needed, have been or can be
secured in a timely manner;
[(c) Recommending how to maximize use of grant or loan moneys to ensure  successful completion
of the work or project for which the grant or loan moneys will be used; ]
[(d)] (c) Assessing the ability of the applicant to repay the grant or loan; and
(d) Applying any other methods or criteria the third-party  administrator considers nec-
essary or convenient for the purpose.
[(e) Documenting the strengths, weaknesses and risks of the applicant and project; and ]
[(f) Making recommendations regarding terms and conditions for approval of a grant or loan. ]
[(8) The department shall adopt rules governing  repayment of loans made under this section and
collection of moneys owed to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board  Fund. The de-
partment may seek appropriate  legal remedies to secure repayment of any loans made under this section
that are due to the fund. ]
[(9)] (7) The [ department may assess and charge ] agreement between the board  and the
third-party administrator shall include limits on administrative  fees, including, but not  limited
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 6
to, application fees, [ for loans or grants made ] under this section that the third-party  adminis-
trator may collect or retain from grant and loan proceeds .
(8) The third-party administrator may enter into an agreement with a lending partner
for the purpose of administering loans made under this section.
(9) The following moneys shall be retained and accumulated by  the third-party adminis-
trator to be used for the purposes set forth in ORS 284.771 to 284.801:
(a) Moneys received as repayment of loans;
(b) Moneys received as repayment of grant proceeds in the event of default by the
grantee under the grant agreement;
(c) Interest and other receipts from outstanding indebtedness; and
(d) Moneys from any other sources received pursuant to an  agreement entered into
pursuant to ORS 284.781 (4).
(10) The agreement shall specify the amount of moneys distributed under section 6 of this
2020 special session Act that the third-party administrator  may retain for expenses incurred
in operating grant and loan programs under this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 284.796 is amended to read:
284.796. The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board[ , in consultation  with the
Oregon Business Development Department, ] shall adopt rules to implement and  administer the pro-
visions of  ORS 284.771 to 284.801 and may consult with the Oregon Business Development De-
partment in the rulemaking process .
SECTION 9.  ORS 284.801 is amended to read:
284.801. (1) The Eastern Oregon Border Economic  Development Board Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Eastern Oregon
Border Economic Development Board Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development
Department[:] for distribution to the third-party administrator under section  6 of this 2020
special session Act.
[(a) For distribution to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board  for the purposes
set forth in ORS 284.771 to 284.801; and ]
[(b) To reimburse the department for the administrative costs of the  department incurred in proc-
essing grant or loan applications, investigating the  eligibility of applicants and servicing outstanding
grants and loans. Reimbursements made under this  paragraph may not exceed an annual amount equal
to the total revenues received in that year from applicant fees assessed and charged  by the department
under ORS 284.791, plus four percent of the total asset value of the fund. ]
(3) Moneys in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund consist of:
[(a) Applicant fees for grants or loans assessed, charged and paid pursuant to ORS 284.791; ]
[(b)] (a) Moneys [ received as repayment of principal and interest on loans  made from the fund
under ORS 284.771 to 284.801 ] returned to the fund upon termination of an agreement pursuant
to section 6 (4)(b) of this 2020 special session Act ;
[(c)] (b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by  the Legislative Assembly;
[(d)] (c) Amounts donated to the fund;
[(e)] (d) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal government, state agencies or local
governments;
[(f)] (e) Lottery bond proceeds [ approved] allocated by the Legislative Assembly  for deposit in
the fund;
[(g)] (f) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
[(h)] (g) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
[(4) All repayments of grants or loans, interest and other receipts from outstanding  indebtedness
or any other sources shall be retained  and accumulated in the fund and shall be used for the purposes
set forth in ORS 284.771 to 284.801. ]
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 7
[(5) The Oregon Business Development Department may enter  into intergovernmental agreements
under ORS chapter 190 as necessary for the administration of the Eastern  Oregon Border Economic
Development Board Fund. ]
SECTION 10. Section 11 of this 2020 special session Act is  added to and made a part of
ORS 284.771 to 284.801.
SECTION 11. (1) On or before June 30  of each year, the third-party administrator shall
submit the following information from the previous 12 months to  the Eastern Oregon Border
Economic Development Board:
(a) The number of businesses or regionally significant industrial sites that were assisted
with grants awarded and loans made through programs under ORS 284.791;
(b) The types and amount of resources leveraged by the grant and loan moneys;
(c) The return on investment, performance and  outcome with respect to jobs and wages
in any area of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region in which  grant and
loan moneys were utilized; and
(d) Any other information the third-party administrator  considers useful in evaluating
the experience of the grant and loan programs.
(2)(a) On or before September 15 of  each year, the Eastern Oregon Border Economic
Development Board shall submit a report, in the manner required under ORS  192.245, to the
Joint Committee on Ways and Means or the Emergency Board, that sets forth  the informa-
tion received from the third-party administrator under subsection (1) of this section and any
other information from any source that the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development
Board thinks convenient or necessary for evaluating the  administration and experience of
the grant and loan program established under ORS 284.771 to 284.801.
(b) The Eastern Oregon Border Economic  Development Board’s report may include re-
commendations for  legislation and strategies to improve workforce development and eco-
nomic development in the region.
SECTION 12.
This 2020 special session Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020
special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by House June 25, 2020
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4209 (HB 4209-INTRO) Page 8